Ohio, session 136, SB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 3721.28, 3721.29, and 3721.30 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 3721.28. (A)(1) Each nurse aide used by a long-term care facility on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or other basis on July 1, 1989, shall be provided by the facility a competency evaluation program approved by the director of health under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section. Each long-term care facility using a nurse aide on July 1, 1989, shall provide the nurse aide the preparation necessary to complete the competency evaluation program by January 1, 1990. (2) Each nurse aide used by a long-term care facility on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or other basis on January 1, 1990, who either was not used by the facility on July 1, 1989, or was used by the facility on July 1, 1989, but had not successfully completed a competency evaluation program by January 1, 1990, shall be provided by the facility a competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section. Each long-term care facility using a nurse aide described in division (A)(2) of this section shall provide the nurse aide the preparation necessary to complete the competency evaluation program by October 1, 1990, and shall assist the nurse aide in registering for the program. (B) Effective June 1, 1990, no long-term care facility shall use an individual as a nurse aide for more than four months unless the individual is competent to provide the services the individual is to provide, the facility has received from the nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code the information concerning the individual provided through the registry, and one of the following is the case: (1) The individual was used by a facility as a nurse aide on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or other basis at any time during the period commencing July 1, 1989, and ending January 1, 1990, and successfully completed, not later than October 1, 1990, a competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section. (2) The individual has successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section or has met the conditions specified in division (F)(1) or (2) of this section and, in addition, if the training and competency evaluation program or the training, instruction, or education the individual completed in meeting the conditions specified in division (F)(1) or (2) of this section was conducted by or in a long-term care facility, the individual has successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director. (3) Prior to July 1, 1989, if the long-term care facility is certified as a skilled nursing facility or a nursing facility under Title XVIII or XIX of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, or prior to January 1, 1990, if the facility is not so certified, the individual completed a program that the director determines included a competency evaluation component no less stringent than the competency evaluation programs approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section, and was otherwise comparable to the training and competency evaluation programs being approved by the director under division (A) of that section. (4) The individual is listed in a nurse aide registry maintained by another state and that state certifies that its program for training and evaluation of competency of nurse aides complies with Titles XVIII and XIX of the "Social Security Act" and regulations adopted thereunder. (5) Prior to July 1, 1989, the individual was found competent to serve as a nurse aide after the completion of a course of nurse aide training of at least one hundred hours' duration. (6) The individual is enrolled in a prelicensure program of nursing education approved by the board of nursing or by an agency of another state that regulates nursing education, has provided the long-term care facility with a certificate from the program indicating that the individual has successfully completed the courses that teach basic nursing skills including infection control, safety and emergency procedures, and personal care, and has successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code. (7) The individual has the equivalent of twelve months or more of full-time employment in the preceding five years as a hospital aide or orderly and has successfully completed a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code. (8) The individual has successfully completed a prelicensure program of nursing education approved by the board of nursing under section 4723.06 of the Revised Code or by an agency of another state that regulates nursing education and has passed the examination accepted by the board of nursing under section 4723.10 of the Revised Code, which shall be deemed as the successful completion of a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code. (C) Effective June 1, 1990, no long-term care facility shall continue for longer than four months to use as a nurse aide an individual who previously met the requirements of division (B) of this section but since most recently doing so has not performed nursing and nursing-related services for monetary compensation for twenty-four consecutive months, unless the individual successfully completes additional training and competency evaluation by complying with divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section: (1) Doing one of the following: (a) Successfully completing a training and competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section; (b) Successfully completing a training and competency evaluation program described in division (B)(4) of this section; (c) Meeting the requirements specified in division (B)(6) or (7) of this section. (2) If the training and competency evaluation program completed under division (C)(1)(a) of this section was conducted by or in a long-term care facility, successfully completing a competency evaluation program conducted by the director. (D)(1) The four-month periods provided for in divisions (B) and (C) of this section include any time, on or after June 1, 1990, that an individual is used as a nurse aide on a full-time, temporary, per diem, or any other basis by the facility or any other long-term care facility. (2) During the four-month period provided for in division (B) of this section, during which a long-term care facility may, subject to division (E) of this section, use as a nurse aide an individual who does not have the qualifications specified in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section, a facility shall require the individual to comply with divisions (D)(2)(a) and (b) of this section: (a) Participate in one of the following: (i) If the individual has successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code, and the program was conducted by or in a long-term care facility, a competency evaluation program conducted by the director; (ii) If the individual is enrolled in a prelicensure program of nursing education described in division (B)(6) of this section and has completed or is working toward completion of the courses described in that division, or the individual has the experience described in division (B)(7) of this section, a competency evaluation program conducted by the director; (iii) A training and competency evaluation program approved by the director under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or conducted by the director under division (C) of that section. (b) If the individual participates in or has successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program under division (D)(2)(a)(iii) of this section that is conducted by or in a long-term care facility, participate in a competency evaluation program conducted by the director. (3) During the four-month period provided for in division (C) of this section, during which a long-term care facility may, subject to division (E) of this section, use as a nurse aide an individual who does not have the qualifications specified in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, a facility shall require the individual to comply with divisions (D)(3)(a) and (b) of this section: (a) Participate in one of the following: (i) If the individual has successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program approved by the director, and the program was conducted by or in a long-term care facility, a competency evaluation program conducted by the director; (ii) If the individual is enrolled in a prelicensure program of nursing education described in division (B)(6) of this section and has completed or is working toward completion of the courses described in that division, or the individual has the experience described in division (B)(7) of this section, a competency evaluation program conducted by the director; (iii) A training and competency evaluation program approved or conducted by the director. (b) If the individual participates in or has successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program under division (D)(3)(a)(iii) of this section that is conducted by or in a long-term care facility, participate in a competency evaluation program conducted by the director. (E) A long-term care facility shall not permit an individual used by the facility as a nurse aide while participating in a training and competency evaluation program to provide nursing and nursing-related services unless both of the following are the case: (1) The individual has completed the number of hours of training that must be completed prior to providing services to residents as prescribed by rules that shall be adopted by the director in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code; (2) The individual is under the personal supervision of a registered or licensed practical nurse licensed under Chapter 4723. of the Revised Code. (F) An individual shall be considered to have satisfied the requirement, under division (B)(2) of this section, of having successfully completed a training and competency evaluation program conducted or approved by the director, if either of the following apply: (1) The individual, as of July 1, 1989, met both of the following conditions: (a) Completed at least sixty hours divided between skills training and classroom instruction in the topic areas described in divisions division (B)(1) to (8) of section 3721.30 of the Revised Code; (b) Received at least the difference between seventy-five hours and the number of hours actually spent in training and competency evaluation in supervised practical nurse aide training or regular in-service nurse aide education. (2) The individual meets both of the following conditions: (a) Has completed during the COVID-19 public health emergency declared by the United States secretary of health and human services a minimum of seventy-five hours of training that occurs in a long-term care facility setting, includes on-site observation and work as a nurse aide under a COVID-19 pandemic waiver issued by the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services, and addresses all of the required areas specified in 42 C.F.R. 483.152(b), except that if gaps in on-site training are identified, the individual also must complete supplemental training; (b) Has successfully completed the competency evaluation conducted by the director of health under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code. (G) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code specifying persons, in addition to the director, who may establish competence of nurse aides under division (B)(5) of this section, and establishing criteria for determining whether an individual meets the conditions specified in division (F)(1) of this section. (H) The rules adopted pursuant to divisions (E)(1) and (G) of this section shall be no less stringent than the requirements, guidelines, and procedures established by the United States secretary of health and human services under sections 1819 and 1919 of the "Social Security Act." Sec. 3721.29. In addition to competency evaluation programs and training and competency evaluation programs required by this chapter, each long-term care facility shall provide both of the following to each nurse aide it uses: (A) An orientation program that includes at least an explanation of the organizational structure of the facility, its policies and procedures, its philosophy of care, a description of its resident population, and an enumeration of its employee rules; (B) Regular performance review and in-service education to assure that individuals working in the facility as nurse aides are competent to perform the nursing and nursing-related services they perform. In-service education shall include training for nurse aides providing nursing and nursing-related services to residents and patients with cognitive impairments, including two hours annually of dementia-specific training that meets the requirements for training and competency evaluation programs under division (B)(2) of section 3721.30 of the Revised Code. The director of health shall adopt rules to implement the purposes of this section. The rules shall be no less stringent than the requirements, guidelines, and procedures established by the United States secretary of health and human services under sections 1819 and 1919 of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended. Sec. 3721.30. (A)(1) A training and competency evaluation program approved by the director of health under division (A) of section 3721.31 of the Revised Code or a competency evaluation program conducted by the director under division (C) of that section shall evaluate the competency of a nurse aide in the following areas: (a) Basic nursing skills; (b) Personal care skills; (c) Recognition of mental health and social service needs; (d) Care of residents with cognitive impairments; (e) Basic restorative services; (f) Residents' rights; (g) Any other area specified by rule of the director. (2) Any training and competency evaluation program approved or competency evaluation program conducted by the director may include a written examination, but shall permit a nurse aide, at the nurse aide's option, to establish competency in another manner approved by the director. A nurse aide shall be permitted to have the competency evaluation conducted at the long-term care facility at which the nurse aide is or will be employed, unless the facility has been determined by the director or the United States secretary of health and human services to have been out of compliance with the requirements of subsection (b), (c), or (d) of section 1819 or 1919 of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C.A. 301, as amended, within the previous two years. (B) A training and competency evaluation program approved or conducted by the director under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code shall consist of training and competency evaluation specified by the director in rules adopted under division (C)(G) of this section, including a : (1) A minimum of seventy-five hours divided between skills training and classroom instruction in the following topic areas: (1)(a) Basic nursing skills; (2)(b) Personal care skills; (3)(c) Recognition of mental health and social service needs; (4)(d) Care of residents with cognitive impairments; (5)(e) Basic restorative services; (6)(f) Residents' rights; (7)(g) Needs of various groups of long-term care facility residents and patients; (8)(h) Other topic areas specified by rule of the director. (2) Beginning not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this amendment, a minimum of two hours of dementia-specific training on the following topics: (a) An overview of dementia, including its different types; (b) Communication techniques for interacting with individuals with dementia; (b) Behavioral symptoms of individuals with dementia and management of those symptoms; (c) Person-centered care practices; (d) Promoting dignity, independence, and quality of life for individuals with dementia; (e) Nursing home resident rights established under section 3721.13 of the Revised Code. (C) The department of health shall approve dementia-specific training programs that meet the requirements described in division (B)(2) of this section, including any of the following: (1) Accredited in-person or online courses; (2) Programs developed or endorsed by recognized dementia care organizations, including the essentiALZ program offered by the Alzheimer's association; (3) State provided or licensed training modules; (4) Programs developed by a nursing home or residential care facility. (D) Each nursing home and residential care facility shall maintain records of compliance under division (B)(2) of this section for each nurse aid employed by the home or facility. (E) No nurse aide shall provide direct care to residents with dementia until the nurse aide has completed the training required under division (B)(2) of this section. (F) If the director of health determines that a nursing home or residential care facility has violated or failed to comply with the dementia-specific training requirements under division (B)(2) of this section, the director may do any of the following: (1) Impose a fine in an amount determined by the director; (2) Request a licensee to submit an acceptable plan of correction to the director; (3) In accordance with section 3721.07 of the Revised Coke, revoke a license to operate. (G) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director shall adopt rules establishing procedures and criteria for approval of training and competency evaluation programs. The requirements established by rules shall be no less stringent than the requirements, guidelines, and procedures established by the United States secretary of health and human services under sections 1819 and 1919 of the "Social Security Act." The director also shall adopt rules governing all of the following: (1) Procedures for determination of an individual's competency to perform services as a nurse aide; (2) The curriculum of training and competency evaluation programs; (3) The clinical supervision and physical facilities used for training and competency evaluation programs; (4) The number of hours of training required in training and competency evaluation programs; (5) The qualifications for instructors, coordinators, and evaluators of training and competency evaluation programs, except that the rules shall not require an instructor for a training and competency evaluation program to have nursing home experience if the program is under the general supervision of a coordinator who is a registered nurse who possesses a minimum of two years of nursing experience, at least one of which is in the provision of services in a nursing home or intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities; (6) Requirements that training and competency evaluation programs must meet to retain approval; (7) Standards for successful completion of a training and competency evaluation program; (8) Procedures and criteria for review and reapproval of training and competency evaluation programs; (9) Fees for application for approval or reapproval of training and competency evaluation programs and programs to train instructors, coordinators, and evaluators for training and competency evaluation programs; (10) Fees for participation in any training and competency evaluation program or other program conducted by the director under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code; (11) Procedures for reporting to the nurse aide registry established under section 3721.32 of the Revised Code whether or not individuals participating in training and competency evaluation programs have successfully completed the programs. (D)(H) In accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the director may adopt rules prescribing criteria and procedures for approval of training programs for instructors, coordinators, and evaluators for competency evaluation programs and training and competency evaluation programs. The director may adopt other rules that the director considers necessary for the administration and enforcement of sections 3721.28 to 3721.34 of the Revised Code or for compliance with requirements, guidelines, or procedures issued by the United States secretary of health and human services for implementation of section 1819 or 1919 of the "Social Security Act." (E)(I) No person or government entity shall impose on a nurse aide any charge for participation in any competency evaluation program or training and competency evaluation program approved or conducted by the director under section 3721.31 of the Revised Code, including any charge for textbooks, other required course materials, or a competency evaluation. (F)(J) No person or government entity shall require that an individual used by the person or government entity as a nurse aide or seeking employment as a nurse aide pay or repay, either before or while the individual is employed by the person or government entity or when the individual leaves the person or government entity's employ, any costs associated with the individual's participation in a competency evaluation program or training and competency evaluation program approved or conducted by the director. (K) As used in this section, "dementia" has the same meaning as in section 5163.03 of the Revised Code. Section 2. That existing sections 3721.28, 3721.29, and 3721.30 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Ohio Dementia Care Training Act for Nurse Aides.